trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="A_V3C_inc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_int_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresInd_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd_23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ir"/>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_3"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esca</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esques</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esca</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esquen</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_í"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_í"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ir"/>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="A_V3C_inc_ï">
      <e>
        <par n="accep_i_cons"/>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_int_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_int_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l>ï</l>
          <r><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresInd_inc_ï"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd_ï"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_i_cons"/>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_ï"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l>sca</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l>sques</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l>sca</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l>squen</l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_í"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_í"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ï"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ir"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>compl</l>
          <r>complir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ou"/>
        <p>
          <l>br</l>
          <r>cobrir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ff"/>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>definir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derrencl</l>
          <r>derrenclir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>desment</l>
          <r>desmentir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>discern</l>
          <r>discernir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enfort</l>
          <r>enfortir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enriqu</l>
          <r>enriquir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>sclar</l>
          <r>esclarir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ff"/>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ll"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>fallir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_ff"/>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>finir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="esborrat_a_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>gra</l>
          <r>agrair<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>guarir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acquir</l>
          <r>adquirir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>entendr</l>
          <r>entendrir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atendr</l>
          <r>atendrir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>benes</l>
          <r>benesir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>compu</i>
        <par n="accep_ny"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>nyir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>coste</l>
          <r>costeir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>descend</l>
          <r>descendir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deslencl</l>
          <r>deslenclir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>destr</i>
        <par n="accep_ou"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>uir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>discut</l>
          <r>discutir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>condu</l>
          <r>conduir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imprim</l>
          <r>imprimir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>enorgu</i>
        <par n="accep_ll"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>llir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guar</l>
          <r>guarir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>invert</l>
          <r>invertir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>sgrem</l>
          <r>esgrimir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>spaord</l>
          <r>espaordir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>sves</l>
          <r>esvesir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>exo</l>
          <r>exoir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="subst_ex_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>ped</l>
          <r>pedir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>sprim</l>
          <r>esprimir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>impl</l>
          <r>implir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jaus</l>
          <r>jausir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>negr</l>
          <r>negrir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ofr</l>
          <r>ofrir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pervert</l>
          <r>pervertir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>prefer</l>
          <r>preferir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>pu</i>
        <par n="accep_ny"/>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>nyir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rend</l>
          <r>rendir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>roman</l>
          <r>romanir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>somon</l>
          <r>somonir<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tra</l>
          <r>trair<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
